New Mexico, session 2026, SB190.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. Laws 2006, Chapter 89, Section 1, as amended by Laws 2007, Chapter 215, Section 1, Laws 2008, Chapter 60, Section 1, Laws 2013, Chapter 14, Section 1 and Laws 2019, Chapter 204, Section 1, is compiled in the New Mexico Finance Authority Act and is amended to read: "[TEMPORARY PROVISION--NEW MEXICO FINANCE] AUTHORITY REVENUE BONDS--[PURPOSE--APPROPRIATION] AUTHORIZED--GILA REGIONAL MEDICAL CENTER AND NOR-LEA GENERAL HOSPITAL.-- A. The [New Mexico finance] authority may issue and sell revenue bonds in compliance with the New Mexico Finance Authority Act for a term not exceeding twenty years in an amount not exceeding three million dollars ($3,000,000) for the purpose of designing, constructing, equipping and furnishing additions and improvements to a regional cancer treatment center at the Gila regional medical center in Grant county. The authority may issue and sell revenue bonds authorized by this subsection when the chair of the board of county commissioners of Grant county certifies the need for issuance of the bonds. The net proceeds from the sale of the bonds are appropriated to the local government division of the department of finance and administration for the purposes described in this subsection. B. After the bonds have been issued pursuant to Subsection A of this section, the [New Mexico finance] authority may issue and sell revenue bonds in compliance with the New Mexico Finance Authority Act for a term not exceeding twenty years in an amount not exceeding one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) for the purpose of designing, constructing, equipping and furnishing additions and improvements to a regional cancer treatment center at the Nor-Lea general hospital in Lea county. The authority may issue and sell revenue bonds authorized by this subsection when the chair of the board of trustees of the Nor-Lea special hospital district certifies the need for issuance of the bonds; provided that, if the authority determines that excess balances exist in the rural county cancer treatment fund above the amount needed to service outstanding bonds, then, in lieu of issuing all or a portion of the bonds, the excess balances may be used for the cancer treatment center funded pursuant to this subsection, but the total of excess balances and bond proceeds shall not exceed one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000). The net proceeds from the sale of the bonds and any excess balances are appropriated to the local government division of the department of finance and administration for the purposes described in this subsection. C. After the bonds have been issued pursuant to Subsections A and B of this section, the [New Mexico finance] authority may issue and sell revenue bonds in compliance with the New Mexico Finance Authority Act for a term not exceeding twenty years in an amount not exceeding three million dollars ($3,000,000) as follows: (1) not to exceed two million two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($2,250,000) to design, construct, equip and furnish additions and improvements to a regional cancer treatment center at the Gila regional medical center in Grant county; and (2) not to exceed seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000) to design, construct, equip and furnish additions and improvements to Nor-Lea general hospital in Lea county. D. After the bonds have been issued pursuant to Subsections A, B and C of this section, the [New Mexico finance] authority may issue and sell revenue bonds in compliance with the New Mexico Finance Authority Act for a term not exceeding twenty years in an amount not exceeding one million two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($1,250,000) for the following purposes at the regional cancer treatment center at the Gila regional medical center in Grant county: for the purchase of computer hardware, servers, cabling, software licenses and related services necessary for implementation and maintenance of an electronic health records system, cancer patient treatment, regulatory compliance and reporting; to design, construct, renovate, equip and furnish additions and improvements of the chemotherapy intravenous preparation clean room; for the purchase of a positron emission tomography scanner; or to prepay any loan made by the authority from the public project revolving fund to or for the benefit of the Gila regional medical center for the purposes authorized by this subsection. E. The authority may issue and sell revenue bonds authorized by Subsection C of this section when the boards of trustees of the Gila regional medical center and the Nor-Lea special hospital district certify the need for the issuance of the bonds. If the authority determines that there are balances in the rural county cancer treatment fund in excess of the amount needed to service outstanding bonds, the authority may use those balances in lieu of issuing all or a portion of the bonds authorized in Subsection C of this section, but the total of funding from bonds and balances shall not exceed three million dollars ($3,000,000). The net proceeds from the sale of bonds and any excess balances are appropriated to the local government division of the department of finance and administration for the purposes described in Subsection B of this section. F. The authority may issue and sell revenue bonds authorized by Subsection D of this section when the chair of the board of trustees of the Gila regional medical center certifies the need for issuance of the bonds. If the authority determines there are balances in the rural county cancer treatment fund in excess of the amount needed to service outstanding bonds, the authority may use those balances in lieu of issuing all or a portion of the bonds authorized in Subsection D of this section, but the total of excess balances and bond proceeds shall not exceed one million two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($1,250,000). The net proceeds from the sale of the bonds and any excess balances are appropriated to the authority for the purposes described in this subsection. G. After the bonds have been issued pursuant to Subsections A through D of this section, the authority may issue and sell revenue bonds in compliance with the New Mexico Finance Authority Act for a term not exceeding twenty years in an amount not exceeding five million seven hundred thirty-five thousand three hundred sixteen dollars ($5,735,316) for the regional cancer treatment center at the Gila regional medical center in Grant county for the purchase of equipment, computer hardware and software and to renovate rooms in the medical center. H. The authority may issue and sell revenue bonds authorized by Subsection G of this section when the chair of the board of trustees of the Gila regional medical center certifies the need for issuance of the bonds. If the authority determines that there are balances in the rural county cancer treatment fund in excess of the amount needed to service outstanding bonds, the authority may use those balances in lieu of issuing all or a portion of the bonds authorized in Subsection G of this section, but the total of excess balances and bond proceeds shall not exceed five million seven hundred thirty-five thousand three hundred sixteen dollars ($5,735,316). The net proceeds from the sale of the bonds and any excess balances are appropriated to the authority for the purposes described in this subsection. [G.] I. The cigarette tax proceeds distributed to the authority pursuant to Subsection E of Section 7-1-6.11 NMSA 1978 shall be pledged irrevocably for the payment of the principal, interest, premiums and related expenses on the bonds and for payment of the expenses incurred by the authority related to the issuance, sale and administration of the bonds. [H.] J. The cigarette tax proceeds distributed to the authority pursuant to Subsection E of Section 7-1-6.11 NMSA 1978 shall be deposited each month in a separate fund or account of the authority. [I.] K. Upon payment of all principal, interest and other expenses or obligations related to the bonds, the authority shall certify to the secretary of taxation and revenue that all obligations for the bonds issued pursuant to this section have been fully discharged and shall direct the secretary of taxation and revenue to cease distributing cigarette tax proceeds to the authority pursuant to Subsection E of Section 7-1-6.11 NMSA 1978 and to distribute those cigarette tax proceeds to the general fund. [J.] L. Any law authorizing the imposition, collection or distribution of the cigarette tax or that affects the cigarette tax shall not be amended, repealed or otherwise directly or indirectly modified so as to impair or reduce debt service coverage for any outstanding revenue bonds that may be secured by a pledge of those cigarette tax revenues, unless the revenue bonds have been discharged in full or provisions have been made for a full discharge. [K.] M. The authority may additionally secure the revenue bonds issued pursuant to this section by a pledge of money in the public project revolving fund with a lien priority on the money in the public project revolving fund as determined by the authority. [L.] N. The authority may purchase revenue bonds issued pursuant to this section with money in the public project revolving fund pursuant to the provisions of Section 6-21-6 NMSA 1978." - 8 -